Massachusetts, session 194th, S893.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 11 of chapter 12C of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 343 
of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the word “may” and inserting in place thereof 
the following word:- shall 
SECTION 2.  Said section 11 is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the 
following sentence:-  “The center may promulgate regulations to define “just cause” for the 
purposes of this section.”. 
SECTION 3.  Section 51G of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 
343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:- 
“(9) No original license shall be granted, or renewed, to establish or maintain an acute-
care hospital, as defined by section 25B, if the applicant is a for-profit person or entity which, on 

of 2 11 or after April 1, 2024, becomes a successor to a non-profit acute care hospital as a result of any 
sale, lease, exchange, merger or other disposition or conversion of the property, assets or 
operations of a non-profit acute care hospital.”.